

 

    Chapter 2: Number System, Conversion and Boolean Logic 

1's and 2's Complement

1's Complement: Reciprocal of 1s to 0s and 0s to 1s is its 1's complement. For eg, 1's Complement of (1011)2 is (0100)2 

2's Complement: Adding 1 to the 1's complement of a given binary number is its 2's complement. 

For eg, if (1010)2 is a given number then, its

1's complement is (0101)2 and 2's complement is (0101)2 +(1)2 = (0110)2

Very important
Subtraction using 1's and 2's Complement

Rules to remember [ let us consider, question be  X-Y]
Using 1's Complement	Using 2's Complement
Calculate 1's complement of ‘Y’	Calculate 2's complement of ‘Y’
Add result of step 1 with ‘X’	Add result of step 1 with ‘X’
If there is extra bit, remove that extra bit and add on its remaining bit.	If there is extra bit, remove that extra bit.
If there is no extra bit, find 1's Complement of result in step 2 and add (-)ve sign.	If there is no extra bit, find 2's Complement of result in step 2 and add (-)ve sign.

Example ( Sure question for Board exam)

Q) Subtract (1000)2 from (111)2 using 1's and 2's complement.

Ans. Given question is (111)2 - (1000)2

A) Using 1's Complement, 

First calculating 1's complement of (1000)2 is (0111)2

Adding (0111)2 with (111)2  we get

(0111)2 + (0111)2 = (1110)2

Since,  there is no extra bit i.e. 4 digits added with 4 digits and gives 4 digits result

Calculating 1's complement of (1110)2 we get (0001)2 and putting (-)ve sign

Hence, result is -(0001)2

B) Using 2's Complement, 

First calculating 2's complement of (1000)2 is (0111)2 + (1)2 = (1000)2

Adding (1000)2 with (111)2  we get

(1000)2 + (0111)2 = (1111)2

Since,  there is no extra bit i.e. 4 digits added with 4 digits and gives 4 digits result

Calculating 2's complement of (1111)2 we get (0000)2 + (1)2 = (0001)2 and putting (-)ve sign

Hence, result is -(0001)2 

Q) Subtract (11001)2 from (11101)2 using 1's and 2's complement.

Ans. Given question is (11101)2 - (11001)2

A) Using 1's Complement, 

First calculating 1's complement of (11001)2 is (00110)2

Adding (00110)2 with (11101)2  we get

(00110)2 + (11101)2 = (100011)2

Since,  there is  extra bit i.e. 5 digits added with 5 digits and gives 6 digits result

Removing that extra bit and adding on it

(00011)2 + (1)2 = (00100)2

Hence, result is (00100)2

B) Using 2's Complement, 

First calculating 2's complement of (11001)2 is (00110)2 + (1)2 = (00111)2

Adding (00111)2 with (11101)2  we get

(00111)2 + (11101)2 = (100100)2

Since,  there is  extra bit i.e. 5 digits added with 5 digits and gives 6 digits result

Removing that extra bit, we get (00100)2

Hence, result is (00100)2

Click here for more solved examples.
Introduction: Boolean Logic

Boolean Algebra is algebra of logic, which deals with the study of binary variables and logical operation. As every data are represented in terms  binary values, we need to manipulate those values by using some certain rules and expression which we can do through Boolean algebra. It is most common and basic method to analysis and design logic circuit. It was introduced by an English mathematician George Boole. In Boolean algebra the variables can have only one of the two possible value 0 and1 (False or True). Every modern digital computers understand either this two values.

Boolean algebra: It is algebra of logic which could accept either of the possible two values 0 and 1 and generate a result through logical relationship and operation.

Boolean variable: Those entities which has either or 0 and 1 and denote some specific operation ore known as boolean variable. Simply, it is an entity in Boolean algebra which has only either of the two possible values. This variable are denoted by A, B, P, Q, X, Y, Z….

Boolean function (logic functions): Boolean function is an expression formed by binary variables, binary operators such as AND, OR, NOT, parentheses, and equal sign for a given set of value this boolean function gives the 0 or 1 as a result.

let us consider,

F = XYZ’+XY

Where, F is a boolean function

X, Y, Z are a boolean variable.

X, Y, Z, Z’ are also literals.

Truth Table: A table which represents the input-output  relationship between of the binary variables for each logical gate called truth table. It shows the relationship between input and output in tabular form. Thus, truth table is table representing the results the logical operation of the logical operation on all possible combination of logical values.

Boolean Operator and Operands

Operators are the symbols that define the specific operation. These are three basic operators used in Boolean Algebra, ie. AND, OR, NOT. Every other operations can be expressed in terms of this basic operation. For examples, NOR operator is the combination of NOT and OR operators. The three basic operators are:

a. AND Operators: AND operator is represented by “.” So, A AND B is represented by (A.B) . The  result of the AND operation is exactly same as simple arithmetic multiplication. That means result will be high (1) only when both the inputs are high. Note: A AND B can also represented bu  AˆB or AnB. Truth table of AND operation is given below
A	B	Y = A.B
0	0	0
0	1	0
1	0	0
1	1	1

b. OR Operator: OR operator is represented by “+” So, A OR B is represented by (A+B) . The  result of the OR operation is exactly same as simple arithmetic addition. That means result will be low (0) if and only both the inputs are low. Note: A OR B can also represented bu  AvB or AuB. Truth table of AND operation is given below
A	B	Y = A+B
0	0	0
0	1	1
1	0	1
1	1	1

c. NOT Operator: NOT operator is represented by “-” or “ ’ ”  So, NOT operation of an operands A is represented as A’ . NOT operation performs negation. That means it will give high output (1) for low input (0) and vice-versa. Truth table of NOT operation is given below
A	A'
0	1
1	0
Logic Gate

A logic Gate is an electronic circuit that operates on one or more inputs to produce an output. Logic Gate are used for binary operations which are very fundamental components for modern digital computer. Logic gates are embedded unit an Integrated Circuit (IC). Each gate has its specific function and graphical symbol. In digital computer there are three basic logic gates. Click here for gate symbol and Venn diagram.

a. AND gate: AND Gate is an electronic Circuit which produce high output (1) only when both the inputs are high. The output is same as the result of basic arithmetic multiplication. This gate may have more than two inputs and produce a single output. Graphically AND gate is represented as

AND gate is denoted by “ . ” So, output is expressed algebraically as, Y = A

Truth table for AND gate is
A	B	Y = A.B
0	0	0
0	1	0
1	0	0
1	1	1

b. OR Gate: OR Gate is an electronic circuit which produce low output (0), when all the inputs are low (0) and produce high (1) output for every possible combination of 0 and 1. The output is same as basic binary addition. The gate may have two or more than two inputs and produce single result.

Graphically OR gate is represented as

Algebraically output of OR Gate is represented as: Y = A+B

Truth table of OR Gate is
A	B	Y = A+B
0	0	0
0	1	1
1	0	1
1	1	1

c. NOT Gate: NOT Gate is another fundamental gate whose result is complement of its input. It is also called inverter. It produces low-0 logic for high-1 input and vice-versa. This Gate has single input and single output. Graphically NOT gate is represented as:

Algebraically output of NOT Gate is represented as: Y = A’ for input A

Truth table of NOT gate is:
A	A'
0	1
1	0

d. NAND Gate: NAND gate is a derived gate, derived from NOT and AND gate. This gate reciprocal the output obtain from the AND gate. That means it will produce low-0 output when both the inputs are high-1 and produce high-1 output when any one of the input is low-0. These gate also may have two or more than two and a single output.

Graphically NAND gate is represented as:

Algebraically output of NAND Gate is represented as: Y = (A.B)’

Truth table of NAND Gate is:
A	B	A.B	y=(A.B)'
0	0	0	1
0	1	0	1
1	0	0	1
1	1	1	0

e. NOR gate: NOR gate is a derived gate derived from the combination of OR gate and NOT gate. This gate reciprocal the output obtain from the OR gate. That means NOR gate will produce high-1 logic when both the inputs are low-0 and produce low output-0 in all possible combination of 0 and 1. These gate also may have two or more than two input at a single output.

Graphically NOR gate is represented as

Algebraically output of NOR gate is represented as: Y: (A+B)’

Truth Table of NOR gate is
A	B	 A+B	Y = (A+B)'
0	0	0	1
0	1	1	0
1	0	1	0
1	1	1	0

f. Exclusive OR (X-OR): It is the type of digital electronic circuit will generates low-0 output when both the inputs are either low-0 or high-1. It will give high-1 output only when one of the given input is high. These gate also may have two or more the two input.

Graphically X-OR gate is represented as

Algebraically output of X-OR gate is represented as: Y: A’.B + A.B’

Truth Table of X-OR gate is
A	B	A'	B'	A'.B	A.B'	A'.B+A.B'
0	0	1	1	0	0	0
0	1	1	0	1	0	1
1	0	0	1	0	1	1
1	1	0	0	0	0	0

g. Exclusive NOR (X-NOR): It is the type of digital electronic circuit will generates high-1 output when both the inputs are either low-0 or high-1. It will give low-0 output only when one of the given input is high-1. These gate also may have two or more the two input.

Graphically X-NOR gate is represented as

Algebraically output of X-NOR gate is represented as: Y: A.B + A’.B’

Truth Table of X-NOR gate is
A	B	A'	B'	A.B	A'.B'	A.B+A'.B'
0	0	1	1	0	1	1
0	1	1	0	0	0	0
1	0	0	1	0	0	0
1	1	0	0	1	0	1
De-Morgan's Theorem

First Theorem: The De-Morgan's first theorem states that, “The complement of a sum equals to the product of its complement.”

It is represented as: (A+B)' = A'.B''

Graphical symbol

Proof:
A	B	(A+B)	(A+B)'	A'	B'	A'.B'
0	0	0	1	1	1	1
0	1	1	0	1	0	0
1	0	1	0	0	1	0
1	1	1	0	0	0	0

Second Theorem: The De-Morgan's second theorem states that, “The complement of a product equals to the sum of its complement.”

It is represented as: (A.B)' = A'+B''

Graphical symbol

Proof:
A	B	(A.B)	(A.B)'	A'	B'	A'+B'
0	0	0	1	1	1	1
0	1	0	1	1	0	1
1	0	0	1	0	1	1
1	1	1	0	0	0	0

    Chapter 3: Computer software and Operating System 

Software - Introduction:

As we know stand alone hardware cannot do nothing, for the smooth operation of our Computer System there should be proper coordination between hardware and software. Software helps to mobilize the hardware and other  resources. In order to mobilize hardware we have to write several set of instruction which instruct computer  what to do, what not o. These set of instruction are collectively know as program and the term software is the collection of related programs and  associated documents. In Order to produce useful output, hardware and software must work together. Nothing useful can be done with the hardware only and software cannot be utilize without hardware. The different types of software are:

1) System software: System software is set of one or more programs designed to control the operation of our computer system. This type of software doesn't fulfill the specific requirement of the user. They are general program written to assist human in the use of the computer system. In general system software support the running of other software, communicate with peripheral device, support the development of other types of software and monitors the use of various hardware resources. Thus, the system software makes the operation of the computer system more effective and efficient. The system software is categorized into two categories.

1.1) System Management: It is responsible for proper management and functioning of the computers system. All types of management between computer hardware and software is performed by system management software. There are 3 types of system management software:

1.1.1) Operating System: Operating system is a collection program that controls the overall operation of the computer system. It is the 1st program that is loaded into memory when the computer is turned on. It provides platform for other application program to run and execute. It provides user with an interface so that uses can easily communicate with computer. For example Linux, Windows, Mac etc

1.1.2) Utility software: It is the supporting software which is used to perform specific task related to the maintenance of the computer system. Some  of the utility software are included in operating system where as some are available as separate utility in market. They are also called service program. For example  Norton Utility, PC tools, win zip etc

1.1.3) Device driver: A device driver is a software which is responsible for smooth functioning of the hardware device that is connected to the computer. When we add a new  device to the computer, we need to install new software called device driver. Device driver will co-ordinate with the operating system and the newly installed hardware functions properly and smoothly.

1.2) System Development: It refers to set of programs that are use to develop computer program. This type of software are not used by a normal user of the computes. They are used by programmers for the development of new program. There are two types of system development software:

1.2.1) Programming language: The language with which we give instruction to the computer is known as programming language. Programming language are the set of different keywords, variable, operators, loops and other symbols etc. They help to make communication between computer and user. These are two types of programming language low level language and high level language.

1.2.2) Language translator: It is a special kind computer software which translates the programs written one language in another language. It is compulsory for both low and high level language. It is also called language processor. The types of language translator are compiler, interpreter  and assembler.

2) Application Software:  Application software is a set of one or more program which are design to do a specific task. It is made to fulfill the user demand. This program directs a computer to solve user oriented problem such as preparing bills,  calculating mathematical equation, preparing mark sheet etc. The software that are develop for user purpose is called application software.These types of software are generally develop by using high level language. for example Ms-Excel, Photoshop, Billing software etc. There are two types of application software.
 2.1) Packaged software: They are the generalized set of programs design and develop for general purpose. It is generally large sized, error-free, advance and standard software with much more functionality fir especial work. This type of software doesn't perfectly match the requirement of many organization or user. They cannot be changed easily are developed and designed by reputed software Company so they are trust worthy. They are expensive for small organization. for example Ms-Office, Adobe, Macromedia etc.

2.2) Customized /Tailored software: This is a software develop in high level language for special task. This types of software is developed for some specific purpose for solving specific problem of specific user or organization. The requirement on the user or organization can be perfectly matched. They can be changed easily since they are made by local programmer. for example: payroll system, inventory management, school management, billing software, mark sheet evaluation etc.
Operating system - Introduction

An operating system (OS) is an integrated set of program that controls overall resources such as CPU, memory, input-output device of the computer system. The major objective of operating system is to improve the performance and efficiency of a computer system. Like the manager of a company, an operating system is responsible for the smooth and efficient functioning of the entire computer system. The operating system provides the platform for other application program/software to run and execute. It provides user with an interface so that user can easily communicate with computers, which is more convenient to use and operate.

An operating system is a collection of program that controls the overall operation of the computer system. It also controls and co-ordinate the use of hardware, among the various application program for various user. So, it act as an interface between user and the computer hardware. The other major functions of operating system are:

    It controls, monitor and co-ordinate overall operation of our computer system.
    It act as an interface between user and computer.
    It provide platform to develop, run and execute other computer program.
    It manages hardware resources such as CPU,  memories, input-output terminals, networking equipment etc.
    It hides programming and hardware complexity to the user.

    The primary goal of an operating system is to maximize the productivity of a computer system by operating it in most efficient manner and maintaining the amount of human intervention. Some example of operating system are: MS-DOS, Windows, LINUX, MACOS, UNIX, Chrome, Fedora, Ubuntu etc.


 
Functions / Features / Advantages of Operating System (OS) - V.imp

1) Input-Output (I/O) Management: Input-Output is essential to operate any computer. It allows computer to interact with several peripheral devices such as keyboard, mouse, printer, scanner etc.

2) User Interface (UI): User Interface means an ideal environment in which user can work on it so that s/he can interact with the computerized system. Every operating system provides the feature of user interface in order to enhance the experience and joy of using computer or any other computerized system. It act as a bridge between user and computer. There are 2 types of user Interface.

    Character/Command User Interface ( CUI ): Eg MS-DOS
    Graphical User Interface (GUI ): Eg Windows, MAC OS

3) Security: The operating system of a computer has a number of built-in tools  to protect against security threats such as viruses, unauthorized access, suspicious network activity etc. The basic security in a OS is to control access to your computer by setting users and password.

4) Process Management: The process management allocates a processor to execute a chosen process. OS acts as a traffic controller, job scheduler, process scheduler and dispatcher.

5) Memory Management: Memory is a large array of bytes, each with its own address. When the user request CPU for read-write operation. OS determines the amount of memory required for the program instruction and data. Then OS allocates required memory to load the program and  data into RAM. When the program terminates it freeze up the space and new program is loaded.

6) Data Management: Data management allows organizing their data into logical grouping called files.Earlier Operating system does not provide features of data management. Hence, they were inflexible but nowadays, every operating system provide this feature.

7) Command Interpreter: The command interpreter reads the command that a user types in at a terminal, interprets them and translate them into detail set of instruction that computer hardware can understand. Every operating system must have command interpreter for its operation.

8) Dead-Lock prevention: During processing a situation can arise in which a resources shared by two or more process cannot continue because the resources required by a process is held by other. This situation is known as dead lock. For eg. If process-1 allocates resources A and later required resources B and process-2 allocates resources B and later requires resources A. In this situation neither process-1 nor process-2 will be executed. Such situation is called deadlock. Operating system ensure prevention of deadlock by taking situation action by careful allocation of resources.

9) Time sharing: The function of OS that involves CPU to allocate time in a number of user on same computer. This property generally found in network operating system such as windows NT.

10) Virtual Memory: Virtual memory is the feature of an operating system that allows a computer to compensate for shortage of physical memory by transferring temporary files from RAM to disk. Virtual memory has twice as many address as main memory. The process of translating virtual address into real address is known as mapping. The copying of virtual pages from disk to main memory is swapping.
Types of Operating System (OS) - V.imp

Types of Operating System (OS)
Basis of Processing	Basis of User Interface (UI)	Basis of mode of user
Multi programming OS	Character User Interface	Single user
Multi tasking OS	Graphical User Interface	Multi user
Multi processing OS	 	 
Time sharing OS	 	 
Batch processing OS	 	 
Multi threading OS	 	 
Online processing OS	 	 
Real time OS	 	 
A) On the basis of processing

  1) Multi-programming OS: Multi-programming is used in multi-user environment. It is the technique in which multiple user program are executed simultaneously by single processor.  Multi-programming means when two or more than two program are provided to the CPU for processing or loaded in the internal storage of CPU at the same instant of time. From the loaded program once the portion of one program is executed and the portion of another program is executed and so on. Thus, multi-programming refers to concurrent execution of several program. The main purpose of multi-programming is to increase the utilization of computer and its resources. Different forms of multi-programming OS are multi-tasking, multi-processing and multi-user.

 2) Multi-tasking OS: Multi-tasking OS allows more than one program to run concurrently mainly in a single user system. These computer are capable of executing several tasks or program at the same time. For executing several task it can be single or multi-processing system. In some multi-tasking system one of the process is called fore-ground (active) other are called background (inactive). Multi-tasking OS increase the productivity of the user by executing many task simultaneously. Some of the most common example are MS-Windows, Linux, MAC OS etc.

3) Multiprocessing OS: Multi-processing system has more than one processor linked in a coordinated way. Multiprocessing OS supports running a program in more than one CPU. Generally, super server are especially designed to support multiple processor. UNIX is commonly used multi-processing OS. Multi-programming and multiprocessing are no the same concept. Multi-programming involves concurrent execution of two or more programs by a single CPU, whereas multi-processing involves two or more processor (CPU) for controlling the different activities or execution of many program simultaneously. Multi-processing concept is also known as parallel processing. It is more costly and complex technique the multi-programming which dramatically increase the program execution speed of computer.
 

4) Time-Sharing OS: Time sharing is a technique which enable many people located in various terminal to use a particular computer system at a same time. Processors time which is shared among multiple user simultaneously is termed as time sharing. Multiple jobs are executed by the CPU by switching between then, but the switches occurs so frequently that user can receive a immediate response.
 

Advantages:

    Provide quick response.
    Reduce CPU idle time.

Disadvantages:

    Problem of reliability.
    Less security.
    Integrity.

5) Batch processing OS: Batch processing is a technique which requires grouping of similar jobs, which consists of program, data and system command. It is also known offline processing. This type of processing is suitable in program with large completion or involvement. For example, Payroll, Weather forecasting, Statistical analysis and many more. User need not wait while the job is being processed. They can submit their program to the operator and collect them later which means, the jobs are entered stored on a disk in a batch or queue and is executed one after another under the control of the OS.

    Major disadvantage of batch processing is that it does not allow interaction between user and program during execution.

6) Multi-threading OS: A program in execution is known as process and can be divide into multiple smaller sub process. This sub-process are known as thread. Multi-threading OS has the ability to divide process into threads and execute them concurrently. Threads are individual process that execute simultaneously in multi-tasking OS.

7) Real time OS: Real time processing method is one that controls environment by receiving data and taking action quickly to affect the functioning of the environment at the same instant of time. It is an online processing system in which processing time is critical. The entire processing task has to be completed in the predefined time. The real time OS is suitable for following type of operation.

    Airlines or flight seat availability.
    Rocket Launching system
    Whole sell supplier and manufacturer. etc

8) Online processing OS: It is a popular processing technique at present. In this method transaction are processed as soon as it happen at the place of its origin. It is quite simple compare to real time OS. In this type, user can interact or provides input during processing as well. The output is provided back to the user as soon as processing is completed.
B) On the basis of User Interface ( UI )

 A user interface allows user to interact with the computer system. It provides user with an ideal environment so that user can experience better computing. It brings structure to the interaction between user and computer. Without user interface it is almost impossible to operate a computer smoothly. Hence, in order to enhance the experience of using computer, UI plays vital role. Mainly there are 2 types of User Interface (UI).

    Character User Interface (CUI)
    Graphical User Interface (GUI)

1) Character User Interface (CUI): It is a type of operating system in which whole computer operates or depend upon the command issued by user. All the operations that take place in CUI have their own specific command. Hence, they are known as Character User Interface. User have to remember all the command need to operate the computers. So, they are non user friendly. Only the people people having technical knowledge would operate this type of operating system. It is primitive type of OS, in which graphics, pictures, icons, drop-down menu, dialogue box etc are not used which make it more difficult to use. It uses the character or text mode of computer such as DOS and UNIX. A command prompt is a sequence of character used in CUI. Commands are typed in to instruct computer. MS-DOS is a Character User Interface operating system.

The major advantage of this type of OS is they can have quick response as long as user enters correct command whereas, the disadvantages of command driven User Interface is that, they are very difficult to use if the user is beginner and doesn't know correct command. However, it can be used in older system with no processing capabilities and low storage.

Features of CUI

    It is single user and single tasking operating system.
    Less user friendly than GUI.
    Commands are used to instruct the computer.
    User needs to remember the command for operating this system.
    It cannot display graphics, icon, pictures and multimedia.
    It is faster then GUI system
    Pointing devices such as mouse, joystick, track-pad are not recognize.
    It can be used in low memory and low processing computer.

2) Graphical User Interface (GUI):  It is a type of operating system in which computer are operated just by clicking or selecting the required icon or dialogue box instead of writing a direct command to the system. Since graphics like icons, pictures, drop-down menus, dialogue boxes etc are used which makes it more user-friendly than CUI. Since, user doesn't have to remember a single command, every user without technical knowledge can also use this type of OS. Due to user friendly interface, they are simple to use and widely used for domestic application. The goal of graphical operating system is to create a system that the computer user can turn on and operate in right way without any training or by remembering commands. The main advantages of GUI is that they are easy to use especially for beginners. The main disadvantage of GUI is they consume more memory for operation.Windows, MAC OS etc are the example of GUI.
The first Graphical User Interface was designed by Xerox corporations Palo's Alto research center in 1970's, but it was not popular whereas in until the 1980's the emergence of Apple Macintosh that use GUI became popular.

Features of GUI

    It is user-friendly. So, it is easy to use.
    User don't have to remember supports full multimedia and animation.
    It requires larger memory for its processing.
    GUI environments supports full multimedia and animation.
    It can be used in network environment.
    It is multi-tasking, multi-programming, multi-user operating system.
    Every type of peripheral devices can be used.

GUI environment have following basic components.

Icon: Icons are the small pictures that represent commands, files or windows.

Pointer: A symbol (usually angled arrow) that appears on the display screen and that are moved to select objects and commands. They are controlled by a pointing device such as a mouse, track pad, light pens etc.

Desktop: The area on the display screen where icons are grouped is refereed as desktop.

Windows: Windows are displayed on screen and we can change their shape and size at will. Each windows can run a different program or display different information.

Menus: Most graphical user interface let us to execute commands by selecting a choice from a menu.

Folders: Graphical representation of a directory.
 
Differentiate between Character User Interface and Graphical User Interface [ CUI v/s GUI ] V. imp 
 
Character User Interface [ CUI ]
 	Graphical User Interface [ GUI ]
 
In CUI has to interact with the applications by making use of commands.
 	It is a user interface in which user interact with applications by making use of graphics
 
CUI stands for Character User Interface.
 	GUI stands for Graphical User Interface.
 
In CUI only one task can run at a time i.e. Single tasking
 	In GUI more than one task can run at a time simultaneously.
 
It is not user friendly interface.
 	It is very user friendly interface.
 
The user do everything by using commands.
 	Everything are interacted by pointing the application using devices like mouse.
 
Faster than GUI.
 	Slower than CUI.
 
Older computers were operated on CUI.
 	Modern computers use  GUI.
 
eg DOS, UNIX etc
 	eg, Windows, MAC-OS
 

C) On the mode of user: 

There are two types of OS on the basic of mode of user.

    Single User.
    Multi User.

1) Singe User: A single user OS is a type of OS that is develop and intended for use on a computer or similar machine that will only have a single user at any given time. This is the most common type of OS used on a home computer as well as on computer in office or other work environment. There are two general type of single user system. Single user single tasking and another is single user multi tasking. The example of single user single tasking are not much ore feasible for general purpose computing. For eg MS-DOS, PC-DOS etc

2) Multi User: Multi user OS is computer operating system that allows multiple user on different terminal to access a single system with one OS  in it . A multi user OS differs from a single user system on network, in that each user is accessing same OS at different machine. The multi user OS shares computer resources among different users, allowing each user a small slice of the processor time. This concept is also known as time sharing. Due to that, it gives the user the impression that they are all being served simultaneously even though the OS serves them one at a time for example: Linux, UNIX etc.
Some important Operating System in use:

Open source Operating System: Open source generally refers to those applications which source code is freely available in the internet to the world wide user. Basically, the software that falls under general public license are open source software. User can customize the source code of the open source software according to the user requirements. They need not buy the license to use the software. Source code can be modified and re-distributed to any other person legally. This software are free of cost. Some of the examples of Open Source Software are Linux, Unix, Mozilla, Apache etc. Similarly, Open Source operating system are those operating system whose program code are open to all the user. Some common examples of open source operating system are Linux, Unix, Minix, Open Solaris etc.

UNIX: UNIX is a powerful flexible and manageable operating system with good utilities and communication abilities. It is multi-user, multi-tasking and multi-processing operating system. It is used in bigger size machine like mainframe and mini computer. It was develop by AT&T Bell lab around 1970 AD. UNIX is developed in C and Assembly language. The development of the UNIX has given birth to many operating system such as Linux, Solaris etc. These operating system inherits its main feature from UNIX.

Linux: It is open source powerful UNIX based operating system, that can run on variety of platform including Intel, Power PC, DEC Alpha processor as well as multiprocessing system. It was developed by Linux Torvalds at the university of Helsinki as a college project. He release the version of Linux including all the source code. It is user develop product, meaning that user around the world who ran this OS for their own use have develop many of its components and drivers. It is multi-user, multi-tasking and multi-programming OS mainly popular for server system. It is distributed through different distributor such as Red Hat, Open USE, Ubuntu, Fedora, Debian, Granular Linux, Mandriva etc

MAC OS: MAC OS is a popular GUI based OS for Apple Inc. It is used in Apple Macintosh computer. It has very high quality graphical user interface. Earlier version of this OS were only compatible with motorola 68000 series of processors but now they are compatible with Intel processors also.
Some terminologies related with OS.

Spooling: These process is used to balance the difference in speed of high speed CPU and slow speed input-output device. It is primarily  used for printing purpose. When we provide multiple file to print to printer together, although printer can print one file at a time. But, all file get lined up in a queue and get printed one by one. In this process, CPU remains free and user can work on other application. These technique of printing is possible through a capability of operating system known as spooling. The term spooling is derive from the term SPOOL ( Simultaneous Peripheral Operation On Line ).

Process: A process is basically a program in execution. It doesn't mean a program. Program itself is a static while process is dynamic. For simplicity we can define program as a job that resides into the secondary storage ( which is not loaded in main memory ). A process is a program which is currently in running or ready state ( which is loaded in main memory ). A process in a computer maybe in a different possible state.

    Running state: A process is said to be in running state if it is currently running in the processor.
    Ready state: A process is said to be in ready state if it is temporary stopped to let other process run in the processor.
    Blocked state: A process is said to be in blocked state if it is unable to run until some external events happens.

Thread: A single process is divided into multiple sub-process and even once of process goes for input-output operation another piece of same process start executing. This minimize the burden of context switching to some extend. When multiple process are loaded in a memory at once. When one process goes in blocked or ready state, another process is chosen by the scheduler to be in running state. During this phase, the current state of previously running process must be stored somewhere, so that it can resume from that state at the next time. This mechanism is known as context switching. It is very costly operation and it reduces efficiency. To solve such problem newer operating system use the mechanism of threading ( Light-weight process ).

Scheduling: When more than one process are run the operating system must decide which one to run first. This part of OS concerned with this decision is called scheduler and the algorithm it use is called scheduling algorithm. Scheduling can be two types.

    Priority scheduling: Each program or job is assigned with a priority set to the program. In this scheduling job or program having highest priority are treated first or selected to run. The only demerits of this scheduling that small job may have to wait for longer period of time due to having less priority.
    Time-sharing scheduling: Each program loaded in a memory are given fixed amount of time to execute. Every program that are to be executable have equal processing time. So that none of the job depends upon the time taken by another job while processing.

Buffering: A buffer is a small, high-speed storage device, located in I/O units, used to hold data at the time of input/output operations. So it is divided into the input buffer and output buffer. Input buffer accepts data as low speed and release at high speed at CPU, output buffer works in reverse order, it accepts data at high speed from main memory and releases at low speed to output device. Buffering is the process of using buffer during I/O operation. The term buffering is also used while accessing files like audio/video through the internet. Here, it is the process of holding downloaded data before it can be played.

Virtual Memory: In a multi-programming system, when we use multiple programs at the same time, the space of primary memory (RAM) may not be enough to store all the programs. In this case, operating system uses free space of secondary memory to store these data. This free space in secondary memory,  used to store the contents of primary memory temporarily is known as virtual memory. An operating system is responsible for creating, managing and operating virtual memory.

    It is not an actual memory but it is a technique used by operating system to execute large size program with small size available primary memory. This is done by dividing the larger program into small size segments known as pages.
 

 

    Chapter 4: Application Package 

MS-Word (Word Processor)

Introduction: Ms-Word is a text editing or word processing software develop by Microsoft Corporation, USA under MS-Office package. Word processing refers to use of computer to create, edit and print documents. A word processor enables us to create a document, store it electronically in a disk, display it on a screen, modify it by entering commands and characters from keyboard and print it on a printer. MS-Word is a windows based application it has many powerful and advance feature to manipulate the document, With the help of this program we can create any types of documents like letters, reports, thesis, manuals, brochures, advertisement an many other document. Beside creating, editing and modifying the documents MS-Word provides some special facilities such as checking spelling and grammatical error, to search for synonyms and antonyms, to work with columns, tables, special symbols, pictures, graphs, charts and many more. The document created with MS-Word have “.doc” extension. The newer version of MS-Word has newer extension “.docx”".
Features of MS-Word

a. Fast operation: Since, MS-Word is a digital text editing software there is no any mechanical movement associated. Hence, it is faster in operation.

b. Editing text feature (Character formatting): Any type of operation like insert, delete, modify the documents and undo/redo, find/replace can be perform very easily. Similarly, we can customize our text document in any form or style like bold, italic, underline, different font size, different font color, different font style can be perform etc.

c. Permanent storage: Using MS-Word file and documents can be electronically stored in a disk or any other storage media. So, we can retrieve it whenever require.

d. Graphics: Ms-Word allows us to insert several objects like pictures and graph anywhere in the document whenever required.

e. OLE (Object Linking and Embedding): OLE is a technology which are used to share information between program through object. Objects are saved entities of different type like charts, equations, picture, audio and video files etc.

f. Mail merge: Mail merge a useful tool that will allow us to easily produce multiple letters, labels, envelops and more using information stored in a list, database or spreadsheet.

g. Searching: Ms-Word allows us to search any word or text and replace or delete with other necessary ones throughout the entire document.

h. Printing: Ms-Word allows user to print the documents created by the user anytime, anywhere.

i. Formatting a document: Word has various tools which help format a document. Formatting refers to the process of enhancing the appearance of the document to make it more readable and attractive. We can search and replace, display ruler, change a paragraph alignment, change line spacing, creating bullets and numbering to show your information in list. To further enhances the appearance of the text and documents. We can add border and shading even more we can add watermark to denote some confidential information in a document.

j. Spelling and Grammar checker: Ms-Word provides you with several features that will help you to produce professional and error free document. To make your document appear professional, you want to make sure it is free from spelling and grammar error. Word also has feature of checking grammatical and spelling error and notifying users by different colored wavy lines either may be red or green.

k. Use of thesaurus: Ms-word thesaurus makes it possible to look up synonyms and antonyms to words with few clicks of mouse. We can automatically replace a word by a respective antonyms or synonyms.
MS-Excel (Spreadsheet)

MS-Excel is a spreadsheet software in the Microsoft office suite that allows user to store, organize and analyze numerical and text data. It is a part of MS-Office package. A spreadsheet program allows to present information in a clear way. It can be use to perform mathematical calculation using several mathematical formula and equations. Excel also allows us to convert spreadsheet data into various charts like bar-graph, columns and other. It can be use to calculate the data according to the need of the user such as salary sheet, income and expenses statement, balance sheet, budget preparation, grade and percentage calculation etc. Some application areas of excel are:

    Basic mathematical calculation.
    Financial modeling and analysis.
    Statistical analysis
    Scientific and engineering calculation.
    Graphic presentation and more

The extension of MS-Excel file is “.xlsx” and “.xls”".
Common terminologies used in spreadsheet.

Worksheet(Spreadsheet): Worksheet is the collection of rows and columns which are use to list, organize and calculate data.

Workbook: The files that are used in spreadsheet are collectively known as workbook. Workbook are made up of several numbers of worksheet. By default, one workbook have three worksheet.

Cell: The intersection of rows and columns are called cell. In order to refer a cell, enter a column letter followed by row number. For eg, C2 The cell where intersection point is called active cell.
Features of MS-Excel

    It facilitates us to work in a multiple worksheet at a time.
    It allows us to create different types of charts and graphs.
    It allows us to organize and manage large volume of data.
    It allows us to perform any type of calculation automatically by using custom formula and equation.
    It allows us to easily sort the data in ascending and descending order.
    It supports high level features like object linking and embedding.
    It allows us to format a data to make it more attractive by using tools like font size, font color etc.
    Simple computing operation such as cut, copy, paste, find, replace can be easily done.
    It includes internet features such as web tool bar.
    It allows us to store data electronically in any storage medium.

Cell reference in Excel (V.imp)

A cell location in a spreadsheet is referred to as its cell reference. To find a cell reference, simply look at column heading to find which column the cell is in and across to find which row it is in. The cell reference is a combination of column letter and row number such as A1, B3, Z9 … When writing cell reference the column letter should always comes first. Specially cell reference is very important while writing formula or addressing the cell to evaluate the cell. For eg, if we want to add values 3 and 2 which are in A1 and A2 respectively, instead of writing A3=3+2 we write A3=A1+A2

There are two types of cell reference.

Relative cell reference: In excel, a relative cell reference identifies the location of the cell or group of cell. Cell reference are used in formula, functions, charts and other excel commands. By default a spreadsheet cell reference is relative cell reference. This means, the formula and functions can be copied and posted to other cell. A relative cell consist of column letter and row number and intersect at the cell location, An example of relative cell reference would be A1, B4, G9 etc.

Absolute cell reference: In Excel, an absolute cell reference identifies the location of cell or group of cell which also contain column letter and row number surrounded by dollar sign($). An example of absolute cell reference would be $A$2, $G$9, $Z$345 etc. An easy way to add dollar sign us to click on cell reference and then press “F4” key from keyboard. An absolute cell reference is use when you want a cell reference to stay fixed on a specific cell, which means formula and functions can be copied and posted to other cell the formula and function doesn't change.
MS-Powerpoint (Presentation)

Power point is the presentation software in the Microsoft office suite, with power point we can create dynamic and professional presentation by using pre-defined layouts, themes and templates. Powerpoint includes all the features we need to produce professional looking presentation. Powerpoint presentation consists of series of slides which contain information that we want to communicate with our audience, This information can include text, image, graph, charts, video, audio and many more. Presentation program can be used as  a supplement of older visual aid technology such as pamphlets, handouts, posters, chalkboard etc.

The extension of powerpoint file is “.ppt", later version use “.pptx”". Similarly magic point, apple keynote, IBM lotus, Harvard graphics etc are the alternative software for Ms-Powerpoint.
Features of MS-Powerpoint. 

    Formatting of data helps to make document much more attractive, effective and interactive by using tools like font, font color, hyperlinks etc.
    Simple computing operation such as cut, copy, paste, find and replace are supported,
    It allows user to use pre-defined layout, themes and templates which helps in faster development and design of presentation.
    Slide transition and effects can also be used for further requirement,
    We can create our own custom animation.
    It supports both internal and external hyperlink.
    Different bar, graphs, charts can be used to convey, detailed and precise information.
    Internet features such as web toolbar, online help, web linking can also be done.

    Chapter 5: Programming Concepts and logics 

Introduction:

As we know every computerized device does not work by itself. They needed to be given some sort of command that makes computer work. These commands helps to instruct computer and program specific action required by the user. Since the command are given in the form of computer language, we need programming language are used to write the set of instruction which commands the computer to perform certain action collectively called programs. These programs are again integrated in order to make a complete software. Simply software is the collection of different interrelated program which performs specific function.

Program Written in any type of programming language are not understood by the computer hence we need some sort of language translator or processor such as assembler, complier and interpreter which has the basic function of converting program written in any type of language into machine level language.

The program written by the programmer is known as source program. After converting it becomes program.

Qualities of good programs.

    It should be easily understood.
    A program should be correct; it should be error free.
    It should be reliable.
    It should have easily understandable user interface.
    It should be portable and flexible.

Programming Language:

In order to make communication between user and computer, we need a computer language that helps user to generate commands to perform as per the requirement. This language with which we can give instruction to the computer is known as programming language. Programming language are the set of different keywords, variables, operators, loops, and other entities using different character sets including numbers, special symbol and alphanumeric values.

Hence, the process of writing the programming language is known as programming and the person who writes program is programmers.
Types of Programming Language

There are several types of programming language which can be categorized as follows:

    Low level language: Low level language are the machine dependent language which means program written for one type of system cannot be run in another system. Developer should have detail analysis and knowledge about the system for which s/he is going to write a program for. Hence, programming in low level language is very much difficult and time consuming.  Different types of programming language are:

a. Machine level language(1GL): This language consists a sequence of 0’s and 1’s to generate instruction. Since, it uses binary numbers, this type of language is directly understood by processor. So, it has higher execution speed. It is also a machine dependent language in which programmers should have detailed knowledge of the system.

Advantage:

    It is directly understood by the processor so execution speed is relatively high.
    Language translator or processor is not needed.
    They can be used to program specific purpose computer.

Disadvantage:

    It is difficult and time consuming to develop and debug program.
    It is machine dependent language. So, program developed for one system cannot be operated in another system.
    All the syntax and commands are in the form of binary numbers which is difficult to remember.
    Programmers should have detail knowledge about particular system and its architecture.

b. Assembly language(2GL): Assembly language are also an example of low-level language. In this language, instead of writing instruction in the series of 0’s and 1’s we can use mnemonics (symbolic instructions) like ADD, SUB, RST, DIV, MOD and so on. Since it is closer to machine level language, a programmer should have detailed knowledge about computer internal architecture. This language is faster in comparison to high level language. Since, this language is not directly understood by the computer, we need language translator like assembler to convert it into machine level language.

Advantage: 

    It is easier to write, debug and understand programming written in assembly level language compared to machine level language.
    Program execution is higher compared to high level language,
    Since they are machine dependent, they are used to develop different device drivers.

Disadvantage:

    It is machine dependent language, i.e. program made for one processor doesn’t run in another processor.
    Use of mnemonics code makes assembly language much more complex.
    Program development and debugging is more difficult and time consuming compared to high level language.

 

2. High level language: This language is close to English language. High level language code is written in English like structure using mathematical notation. Since it is similar to English language, it is easier to develop and debug the program. It is machine independent language (i.e. program developed for one processor can work on another processor). Since HLL (high level language) are not directly understood by the computers, we need language processor or translator such as complier and interpreter for converting program written in high level language to machine level language. FORTAN (Formula Translator) introduced on 1956 A.D is the first high level language. Nowadays there are many high-level languages like C, C++, python, JavaScript, etc.

Advantage:

    Since it is closer to English language, program written in this language is easier to write, debug and understand.
    Since it is machine independent, program written for one processor can work in another processor.
    Programmer doesn’t have to remember large number of mnemonics and other unusual codes.
    Program development is faster and requires less effort than other language.

Disadvantage: 

    Computer doesn’t understand high level language directly. So the program needs conversion before execution.
    Program execution is slower compared to low level language.

High level language can further be classified into:

a. Procedural oriented Language(3GL): This type of language is high level language which primarily focuses on procedure rather than on data. Hence, they are used to express the logic and the procedure of the program. Since it focuses only on procedure, it is complex and time consuming to write a large program. This type of language follows top to bottom approach i.e. main function is written at the bottom of the program. This type of language doesn’t pose important and powerful feature like data encapsulation, data inheritance, data extraction and so on. So, this type of language has less security compared to object-oriented language. Because of their flexibility, procedure language is able to solve verities of problem. Examples: C, FORTAN, QBasic, etc.

Advantage:

    Program development and debugging is easier compared to low level language.
    More advance and user-friendly software can be developed.
    It is also a machine independent language.
    It is used as general purpose programming.

Disadvantage:

    Language translator or processor is required to execute the program.
    Program execution is slower.
    Data security is less in comparison to other high-level language.

b. Problem/object Oriented Language(4GL): This is the advance form of high-level language which primarily focuses on data rather than procedure. It allows the user to specify what the output should be without describing all the detail (i.e. procedure) of how the data should be manipulated. This type of language follows bottom up approach. That means all main function are written at the bottom of the program whereas classes and object are described at top of the program. Since it has several powerful features such as data encapsulation, data extraction and inheritance, the data are more secure compared to procedure language. Examples: C#, C++, Java, etc.

Advantage:

    Web based application and software can be developed.
    More advance and user-friendly software can be developed.
    It is also machine independent language.

Disadvantage:

    Language translator is required to execute the program.
    Program execution is slower.
    It is difficult to develop hardware-oriented language.

c. Natural Language (5GL): Natural language uses simple statement of common communication language where we could write statements that would look like normal sentences. It is still in developing stage; computer scientists are working hard for developing such language. However, programming language like PROLOG (programming logic) is currently in use. For example: - instead of writing some unusual code, programmers would write: “who are the salesmen who has sold more than 30,000 products last month?”

Advantage: 

    It will be even easier to develop and debug the program.
    It will also be machine independent language.
    More advance and user-friendly program will be made.

Disadvantage: 

    Language translator is required to execute the program.
    Program execution is slower
    It is difficult to develop hardware-oriented language.

Language translator/processor:

Language translator is that system development software which helps to convert program written in assembly or high-level language (source program) into machine level language (object program). Since it is difficult and incontinent to write a program in machine level language, language developer uses several assemblies and high level language which are not directly understood by the computer. Hence, we use different types of language processor to convert and make machine understandable. There are different types of language translators.

    Assembler: These language translator/processor converts program written in assembly level language (source program) into machine understandable language (object language) Since assembly level language are closer to machine level language, the conversion taken by assembler is relatively less. It converts program at once into machine level language.
    Compiler: Those language processors which helps to convert program written in high level language (source program) into machine level program (object program). It converts whole program into machine level language at once. It is the largest method of translating a program in which debugging is complex and time consuming. Programming languages like C, C++, Java, etc. use complier
    Interpreter: This is the type of language which converts program written in high level language (source program) into machine level language (object program). It converts one statement at a time so its debugging can be easier and less time consuming. Its program execution is slower than that of compiler. Most of the new programming language use interpreter which allocate less memory space. Programs like BASIC, C#, Php, etc. use interpreter for conversion.

Difference between compiler and interpreter:

S.N.
	

Compiler
	

Interpreter
1	It translates the whole program into object code at a time.	It translates one line or a single statement of a program into object code at a time.
2	It finds out the error after compiling the complete program.	It finds out the error after translating a line of the program at a time.
3	The translating process is incredibly faster.	The translating process is slower.
4	Compiler based program is difficult to code and debug.	Interpreter based program is easy to code and debug.
5	It is usually a large program and requires larger memory space.	It is usually a smaller program and requires less memory space.
6	New programming language don’t use complier.	New programming language use interpreter.
7	For e.g.: C, C++, java, FORTAN etc.	For e.g.: BASIC. C#, PHP etc.

    Syntax and Semantics:

As we know programming language helps the user to communicate with the computer. User is governing by several set of codes which instruct computer to perform some specific task. This set of codes and its structure is known as syntax. In addition, semantics is the meaning attached to individual word or symbol in programming language. For example:

In q basic:

Print” This is programming”; P

Here, Print is Semantics and whole line is Structure (syntax)

    Error (BUG):

There may be several errors inside a program which stops program from being executed. Thus, an error in a program is known as a bug. This type of error in a program may arise by not following proper rules given by the programming language due to poor problem analysis or maybe due to hardware failure. Error in the program may five ambiguous (not accepted/false) result. The process of removing error from a computer program is known as debugging. There are three types of error:

    Syntax error: the error which may arise due to not following proper rules or format given by the programming language. Every programming language have their own vocabulary, punctuation and structure. Programmers need to follow every detail while programming. This type of error can be detected by language processor such as compilers and interpreter. For e.g. In C, every statement should end with semi-colon at the end of the statement then the errors encounter is syntax error.
    Logical error: Logic refers to idea or concept used to solve a specific problem. If the problem is poorly understood than it may hamper while solving the problem. The error that is encountered due to poorly developed logic is called logical error. This type of error is not detected by language processor. For example: In order to calculate simple interest, we use the formula I =(P*T*R)/100, if we write above mentioned formula, as I=P*T*R, then the error encounter is logical error.
    Runtime error: When a program is running or executing, it is said to be runtime. Hence, the error that are encounters/found while program is being executed is known as runtime error. It is also not detected by language translator. For example: if insufficient memory space, peripheral device not turning on.

Some common terminology in programming:

    Data types: It specifies the type of data to be used in a program. Some common types of data types are:
    Numeric: It is the combination of all the positive and negative whole number including zero.
    Character: it is the possible combination of all the alphanumeric values including especial symbol.
    Variable and Constant: 
    Variable: Those entities which holds either numeric or alphanumeric values and changes its value throughout the time of program execution.
    Constant: Those entities which holds either numeric or alphanumeric values but does not change its value throughout the time of program execution.
    Operands and Operators and Operations:

Let us consider as;

S=A+B

Where S, A, B are operands

+, = are operands

S=A+B denotes sum of two operands A, B which is Operation

Types of operators:

It is a special symbol which helps to make operation successful i.e. it helps to make some specific operation.

Commonly used operators are:

    Arithmetic operators: +, -, /, *
    Relative operators: <, >, >=, <=, =
    Logical operators: AND, OR, NOT

Program Design Tool

There are several program designs tools that are available. Some of the commonly used program design tool are algorithm, flowchart, pseudocode.

Algorithm:

The step by step procedure or sequential steps for solving a specific problem is known as algorithm. Algorithm are written in simple English language and are not even close to any programming language.

Rules for writing algorithm: 

    Algorithm should execute output after a finite step.
    Algorithm should not depend upon any programming language.
    Algorithm should terminate after finite steps.

Examples:

    Write an algorithm to calculate simple interest.

Step 1: Start

Step 2: Read the value of P.T.R

Step 3: Calculate simple interest by using i=(P*T*R)/100

Step 4: Display simple interest(i)

Step 5: Stop

2. Write an algorithm to check greatest number among two number.

Step 1: Start

Step 2: Read any two-number a, b

Step 3: check if (a>b)

              If yes, Display the greatest number is “a” and go to step 4

              If no, Display the greatest number is “b” and go to step 4

Step 4: Stop

Flowchart: 

It is a diagrammatic or pictorial representation of steps involve in algorithm for solving a particular problem is known as flowchart. It uses several geometrical shapes, symbol for representing different action involve in problem solving. There are two types of flowchart:

a. Program Flowchart: It is a type of flowchart which focuses on a specific problem. This type of flowchart portage only a single task (logic) at a time.

Symbols used in flowchart:
SYMBOLS USED IN FLOWCHART

Examples:

    Draw flowchart to calculate simple interest.

    Draw flowchart to find greatest number among two numbers.

b. System Flowchart: It is also a type of flowchart that shows the logical flow of a program and its collection. It shows the overview of the data flow and sequence of operation in a system.

Symbols used in system flowchart:
Symbol used in System flowchart

Example of System Flowchart
Example of system flowchart

What is c programming language?

It is a High Level Programming Language, developed by Dennis Ritchie at AT & T’s Bell Laboratories of USA, in 1970. It is a very powerful programming language. It is used for both system programming and application programming. So, often known as Middle Level Programming Language, also. It means, it supports or works as the low level language and high level language, both. 

What are the features of c language?

The features of c language are:

    It supports high level and level programming both, so known as mid level programming language.
    It is mostly used for System programming but very popular for Application programming, too.
    The program development is faster and more efficient.
    It has very powerful tools and keywords.
    It uses its own text editor.
    It has its own compiler.
    It supports structured programming.
    It is portable easily.
    It has very powerful library functions set.
    Flexible in programming.

What are the advantages and disadvantages of c language?

The advantages are:

    Suitable for system programming.
    It is easier to interact with hardware.
    Easy to learn.
    Program code is secure.
    It is compact and efficient.

The disadvantages are:

    It does not contain runtime checking.
    There is no strict data type checking.
    As the program extends, the debugging becomes more complex because it uses compiler instead of interpreter for the compilation.
    Semi-colon requires for each statement.

 Define the following terms:

a) Editor: This is the area, in which we type the program. C language has its own text editor but we can use any other text editor program also.

b) Pre-processor: This is the collection of complex codes to instruct the machine to understand the certain keywords. It is written with preceding # symbol. For example: #include, in this example, include pre-processor with the hash symbol, uses the instruction or complex codes from the file ‘stdio.h’, which is already stored by c language. These .h files are called header files. So, include pre-processor is used for using the header files.

c) Compiler: It is a type of software to change the source code of high level programming language into machine readable form called object code.

d) Linker: It is also a type of software, which links the various library files with the object codes and creates an executable file with .exe extension. Then, exe file can run independently.

FUNDAMENTAL OF C

Define the character set. Also define the character set used in c language.

The set of alphabets, digits, white characters and other symbols used in any programming language is called a character set. The character set used in c are:

Alphabet – A, B, C, ……..Z and a, b, c, ….z

Digits – 0, 1, 2, …………9

Special Symbols - ~ ‘ ! @ % ^ & * ( ) - _ + = | \ { }  []  : ; “ ‘ <> , . ? /

Define comment. Comment is a text or set of other characters, which is not compiled or executed from the compiler. It is written in the program to give required information to other programmers and the developers themselves. There are two types of comment writing methods:

a. Single line comment: It is written with the // symbol.

Eg. // This is my first program.

b. Multi-line comment: It is written with /*………….*/ symbols.

Eg. /* This is

              multi line

           comment style */

Define C Tokens.

The set of identifiers, keywords, constants, variables and operators is known as C Tokens. It remains as a single unit and compiler does not break in the time of compilation. 

Define the following terms:

a) Identifiers: Identifiers are names for entities in a C program, such as variables, arrays, functions, structures, unions and labels.

b) Keyword: Keyword is a reserved word that is already stored by the c language developer. The reserved word cannot be used as the identifiers. There 32 Keywords in C according to the ANSI (American National Standard Institute) in c language. They are: void, printf, scanf, if, else, while, getch, do, for, break, continue etc 

c) Data types in c: The term Data Types in any language refers to the types of data which can be used in the program execution for entering and manipulating as the values. In the same way, the data types in c also refer to the data types, which can be used as the values. Basically it is of four types. They are:

    int : It represents the integer type data. It means the numbers without the decimal points. It consumes 2 bytes memory. The derived data types from int are short int and long int.
    float : It means the real numbers with the decimal points. It consumes 4 Bytes memory space. It can also be signed and unsigned. Derived data types of it are double and long double.
    char : It is used for a single character (alphabet or symbol) like ‘A’, ‘f’, ‘@’ etc. It requires 1 byte memory. It can also be signed  or unsigned.
    void : void means no value. It means null value. It is used for returning null value to the modules.

d) Constants

e) Variables

f) Statements : The set of keywords, identifiers, operators, variables and constants ended with the semicolon or a curly bracket is called statement. It is of two types:Simple 

    Statement : The statement written in a single line and ended with the semicolon is simple statement.  Eg. printf (“My program”);
    Compound Statement:  The group of simple statements grouped by the curly bracket open and close is the compound statement. Eg.

if (n>0)
{
   a=b+c;
   x=x*x;
   printf(“%d %d”, a,x);
}

g) Escape Sequences: The symbol \ or ‘ is supposed as the Escape character. It means, the compiler of c programming language understands this character and the text after this to take as a special case. And the set of this symbol and the character behind it is known as the Escape Sequence. Some common escape sequences are:
Character	Escape
New Line	\n
Horizontal tab	\t
Null character	\0
Quotation mark	\”
Apostrophe	\’
Backslash (\)	\\

h) Operators: (imp)The symbols, which are used to operate on the operands for the mathematical and logical calculations are known as operators. C programming language has a rich set of built-in operators. Operator that requires two operands are binary (dyadic) operators, operators that require one operand is unary (monadic) and the operator that requires three operands is ternary operator. Eg. a+b, here + is an operator.

Types of operators:

    Arithmetic Operator
    Relational Operator
    Equality Operator
    Logical Operator
    Assignment Operator
    Increment/Decrement Operator
    Conditional Operator (Ternary Operator)
    Bitwise Operator
    Special Operator

i) Library Functions: Functions are the independent sections or the block of statements given a specific name and they can be used by any program according to the requirements. They are developed to perform a certain task. They are of two types:

a) Library Functions: These are the ready-made formula-like functions stored in c language library. They can be used in any program. abs(), printf (), scanf (), clrscr(), getch(), strlen(), sqrt(), etc. are some examples of Library functions.

b) User defined function: The functions developed by the users in their own program are called User-defined functions.

INPUT/OUTPUT (I/O) functions

1. printf() : It is a formatted output function.

Eg. printf(“My School”);

2. scanf() : It is to enter any value to the program.

Eg. scanf(“%d”, &x);

Program Example

a) Write a c program to enter any two numbers and print the sum of them.
# include  
void main()
{
 int a, b, s;
 clrscr();
 printf(“Enter First Number”);
 scanf(“%d”, &a);
 printf(“Enter Second Number”);
 scanf(“%d”, &b);
 s = a + b;
 printf (“The sum is %d”, s);
 getch();
}

b) Write a c program to calculate the area of a rectangle, where the length is 20 and breadth is 15.
# include   
void main( )
{
 int l = 20, b = 15;
 int a;
 clrscr();
 a = l * b;
 printf (“The area is %d”, a);
 getch();
}

c) WAP to calculate the area of a rectangle in c. [Hints: a = l x b]
# include  
void main()
{
 int l, b, a;
 printf (“Enter Length: ”);
 scanf (“%d”, &l);
 printf (“Enter Breadth: “);
 scanf (“%d”, &b);
 a = l * b;
 printf (“The area is %d”, a);
 getch();
}

d) Write a program to enter length and breadth of a rectangle and calculate the perimeter. [p = 2 (l + b) ]
# include  
void main ()
{
 int l, b, p;
 printf (“Enter Length :”);
 scanf (“%d”, &l);
 printf (“Enter Breadth :”);
 scanf (“%d”, &b);
 p = 2 * (l + b);
 printf (“The perimeter is : %d”, p);
 getch();
}

e) WAP to calculate the area of a triangle .
# include  
void main()
{
 int b, h, a;
 printf (“Enter base and height”);
 scanf (“%d %d”, &b, &h);
 a = ½ * b * h;
 printf (“The area is %d”, a);
 getch();
}
 

f) WAP to enter the length of any one side of a square and calculate the area and perimeter in c language.
# include   
void main ()
{
 int l, a, p;
 clrscr ();
 printf (“Enter length”);
 scanf (“%d”, &l);
 a = l * l;
 p = 4 * l;
 printf (“The area is %d and the Perimeter is %d”, a, p);
 getch();
}

g) WAP to calculate the volume of a box.[v=l*b*h]  (Do yourself) 

j) WAP to enter the radius of a circle and print the circumference of it. [c = 2 pi r] (Do yourself) 

CONTROL STRUCTURE IN C (important)

Normally, the program execution flows top to the bottom lines of the programs. It means program executes one line after another. But sometime we need to execute other part of the programs or we need to divert the program flow from its normal execution. In such a case, we need some program statements, which are known as Control Structures. They are of three Types of control structure : a. sequence  b.selection and c. looping

A) Sequence: Program generally flows from top left top right bottom.

WAP to enter the length, breadth and height of a box and calculate the total surface area (TSA). [TSA = 2 * (L*B + B*H + L*H)]
# include  
void main ()
{
 int l, b, h, tsa;
 clrscr();
 printf (“Enter length, breadth and height”);
 scanf (“%d %d %d”, &l, &b, &h);
 tsa = 2 * (L*B + B*H + L*H);
 printf (“Total surface area is %d”, tsa);
 getch ();
}

WAP to enter the radius of a circle and calculate the area . [a = pi r 2]
# include   
void main ()
{
 float r, a;
 printf (“Enter radius”);
 scanf (“%f”, &r);
 a = 22/7 * r * r;
 printf (“The area is %f”, a);
 getch();
}

j) WAP to enter the radius of a circle and print the circumference of it. [c = 2 pi r]

B) Selection/branching/condition: These type of control structure changes the flow of program execution with or with out conditoon.

B.1) Conditional Statements: They break the program flow if the condition is matching. Eg. if, if….else and if…..else….if 

if condition

This condition is used for a single condition and single block of statements.

Syntax: 
if (condition)
{
Block of statements'
}

Example:

1. WAP to enter the marks of English and print “Pass” if it is 40 or more.
# include   
void main ( )
{
 float e;
 printf (“Enter English Marks \n”);
 scanf (“%f”, &e);
 if (e >=  40)
{
 Printf (“Pass”);
}
 getch ( );
}

Note: The above program states only about pass. If the marks is less than 40, it displays blank.

2. WAP to enter the age of a person and print “He can vote”, if the age is 18 or above.
# include  
void main ( )
{
 float a;
 printf (“Enter age \n”);
 scanf (“%f”, &a);
 if (a >=  18)
{
 Printf (“You can vote”);
}
 getch ( );
}

If….else condition

This condition is used for a double conditions and double blocks of statements.

Syntax:               
if (condition)
{
Block of statements'
}
else
{
Block of statements'
}

Example:

1. WAP to enter the marks of English and print “Pass” if it is 40 or more, otherwise “Fail”.
# include  
void main ( )
{
 float e;
 printf (“Enter English Marks \n”);
 scanf (“%f”, &e);
 if (e >=  40)
 {
  printf (“Pass”);
 }
 else
 {
   printf (“Pass”);
 }
 getch ( );
}

Example 2: WAP to enter the age of a person and print “He can vote” if the age is 18 or above, otherwise print “He cannot vote”.
# include  
void main ( )
{
 float e;
 printf (“Enter age\n”);
 scanf (“%f”, &a);
 if (a >=  18)
 {
  printf (“You can vote”);
 }
 else
 {
   printf (“You cant vote”);
 }
 getch ( );
}

Example 3: WAP to check whether given numvber if odd or even
# include  
void main ( )
{
 int n;
 printf (“Enter number\n”);
 scanf (“%d”, &n);
 if (n%2 ==  0)
 {
  printf (“%d is even”,n);
 }
 else
 {
  printf (“%d is odd”,n);
 }
 getch ( );
}

Example 3: WAP to find greatest among two number.
# include  
void main ( )
{
 int a,b;
 printf (“Enter two number\n”);
 scanf (“%d %d”, &a,&b);
 if (a>b)
 {
  printf (“%d is greatest”,a);
 }
 else
 {
  printf (“%d is greatest”,b);
 }
 getch ( );
}

else if statement: This statement is used for the multiple conditions and multiple blocks of statements.

Syntax:
if (condition 1)
{
 Statement Block 1;
}
else if (condition 2)
{
 Statement Block 2;
}
..
..
else
{
default staement
}
 

Example 1: WAP to enter a number and print “Positive” if it is greater than 0, print “Negative” if it is less than 0, otherwise print “Zero”. 
# include  
void main ( )
{
int n;
printf("Enter number");
scanf("%d",&n);
if (n > 0 )
{
 printf (“Positive”);
}
else if (n < 0 )
{
  printf (“Negative”);
}
else
{
 printf (“Zero”);
}
getch ( );
}

Example 2: WAP to enter the percentage and print the division 
# include  
void main ()
{
 float p;
 clrscr ( );
 printf (“Enter percentage:”);
 scanf (“%f”, &p);
 if (p > = 80 && p<=100)
 printf (“Distinction”);
 else if (p>=60 && p<80)
 printf (“First”);
 else if (p>=50 && p<60)
 printf (“Second”);
 else if ( p>=40 && p<50)
 printf (“Third”);
 else
 printf("fail");
getch ();
}

Example 3: WAP to enter 3 number and print gratest number
# include 
void main ( )
{
int a,b,c;
printf("Enter number");
scanf("%d %d %d",&a,&b,&c);
if (a>b && a>c)
{
 printf (“%d is greatest”,a);
}
else if (b>a && b>c)
{
  printf (“%d is greatest”,b);
}
else
{
   printf (“%d is greatest”,c);
}
getch ( );
}

B.2) Unconditional Statements: They break the program flow with out any condition. Eg. goto statement

Syntax
label:
goto label;
OR
goto label;
label:

Program example of goto [This program allows user to only enter value under 100]
# include  
void main ()
{
 float p;
 clrscr ( );
 label:
 printf (“Enter percentage:”);
 scanf (“%f”, &p);
 if (p > 100)
 {
 printf (“Invalid input”);
 goto label;
 }
 getch();
 }
 

C) Looping: Loop is the process of repeating any block of statements up to the given number of times or until the given condition is not over.

There are three types of Loop: 1. for loop 2. while loop and 3. do while loop

FOR… loop: Syntax of for loop

for (initialization; condition; increment/decrement)
            {
                        Statements (s);
            }

Examples:

a) 1, 2, 3, 4, ………….100.
#include  
int main()
{
    int i;
    for (i=1;i<=100;i++)
    {
        printf("%d\n",i);
    }
    return 0;
}

b) 1, 3, 5, 7, ……………..99.

c) 2, 4, 6, 8, ………………100.

d) 5, 10, 15, ………………….50.
#include  
int main()
{
    int i,s;
    for (i=1;i<=10;i++)
    {
        s=5*i;
        printf("%d\n",s);
    }  
    return 0;
}

WAP to calculate sum of n-natural number.
#include  
int main()
{
    int n,i,s=0;
    printf("Enter any number\t");
    scanf("%ld",&n);
    for (i=1;i<=n;i++)
    {
        s=s+i;
    }
    printf("Sum  is %d\n",s);
    return 0;
}

WAP to calculate product of n-natural number. (Factorial of a given number.
#include  
int main()
{
    int n,i,p=1;
    printf("Enter any number\t");
    scanf("%d",&n);
    for (i=1;i<=n;i++)
    {
        p=p*i;
    }
    printf(“Product  is %d\n”,p);
    return 0;
}

WAP to generate fibonacci series. [ 0,1,1,2,3,5,8 …..10th term]
#include  
int main()
{
    int i,a=0,b=1,c;
    printf(“%d%d””,a,b);
    for (i=1;i<=10;i++)
    {
       c=a+b;
       printf(“%d”,c);
       a=b;
       b=c;        
    }
    return 0;
}

WAP to generate 1 2 4 7 11 ...............10th term
#include  
int main()
{
    int i,a=1,g=1;
    for (i=1;i<=10;i++)
    {
       printf(“%d”,a);
       a=a+g;
       g=g+1; 
    }
    return 0;
}

WAP to generate 1 2 5 10 17 ...............10th term
#include  
int main()
{
    int i,a=1,g=1;
    for (i=1;i<=10;i++)
    {
       printf(“%d”,a);
       a=a+g;
       g=g+2;
    }
    return 0;
}

WAP to generate  3 12 27 48 ................10th term
#include  
int main()
{
    int a,i;
    for (i=1;i<=10;i++)
    {
       a=3*I*I;       
       printf(“%d”,a);
    }
    return 0;

WHILE Loop (Entry Control loop)

Syntax:
while(condtion)
{
Block of statements;
}

WAP to calculate sum of n-natural number.
#include  
int main()
{
    int n,s=0,i=1;
    printf("Enter any number\t");
    scanf("%d",&n);
    while (i<=n)
    {
         s = s+i;
  i=i+1;    
    }
    printf("Sum of digits is %ld\n",s);
    return 0;
}

WAP to calculate product of digits of a given number.
#include  
int main()
{
    int n,p=1,i=1;
    printf("Enter any number\t");
    scanf("%d",&n);
    while (i<=n)
    {
         p = p*i;
         i=i+1;    
    }
    printf(“Product of digits is %d\n”,p);
    return 0;
}

WAP to generate 1 2 4 7 11 ...............10th term
#include  
int main()
{
    int i=1,a=1,g=1;
    while (i<=10)
    {
       printf(“%d”,a);
       a=a+g;
       g=g+1;
       i=i+1;
    }
    return 0;
}

WAP to calculate sum of digits of a given number.
#include  
int main()
{
    int n,s=0,r;
    printf("Enter any number\t");
    scanf("%d",&n);
    while (n!=0)
    {
        r = n%10;
        s = s+r;
        n = n/10;
    }
    printf("Sum of digits is %d\n",s);
    return 0;
}

WAP to calculate product of digits of a given number.
#include  
int main()
{
    int n,p=1,r;
    printf("Enter any number\t");
    scanf("%d",&n);
    while (n!=0)
    {
        r = n%10;
        p = p*r;
        n = n/10;
    }
    printf(“Product of digits is %d\n”,p);
    return 0;
}

WAP to reverse a given number.
#include  
int main()
{
    int n,p=0,r;
    printf("Enter any number\t");
    scanf("%d",&n);
    while (n!=0)
    {
        r = n%10;
        p = p*10+r;
        n = n/10;
    }
    printf(“Reverse is %d\n”,p);
    return 0;
}

WAP to check whether given number is palindrome or not.
#include  
int main()
{
    int n,p=0,r,z;
    printf("Enter any number\t");
    scanf("%d",&n);
    z=n;
    while (n!=0)
    {
        r = n%10;
        p = p*10+r;
        n = n/10;     
    }
    if (z==p)
    {
    printf(“%d is palindrome \n”,z);
    }
   else
   {
    printf(“%d is not palindrome \n”,z);
   }
    return 0;
}

WAP to check whether given number is armstrong or not. [153 is Armstrong]
#include  
int main()
{
    int n,s=0,r,z;
    printf("Enter any number\t");
    scanf("%d",&n);
    z=n;
    while (n!=0)
    {
        r = n%10;
        s = s+pow(r,3);
        n = n/10;
    }
    if (z==s)
    {
    printf(“%d is armstrong \n”,z);
    }
   else
   {
    printf(“%d is not armstrong \n”,z);
   }
    return 0;
}

DO Loop

Syntax:
do
{
Block of statements;
}while(condition);

WAP to calculate sum of n-natural number.
#include  
int main()
{
    int n,s=0,i=1;
    printf("Enter any number\t");
    scanf("%d",&n);
    do
    {
         s = s+i;
         i=i+1;    
    }while (i<=n);
    printf("Sum of digits is %ld\n",s);
    return 0;
}

Array

An array is a collection of variables of same type that are represented by a common name i.e. array is the collection of homogenous data type (Contains similar datas). If we declare array as int then it must only contain all integer data and same for floats and char. Each array element is specified by array name followed by index or subscript enclosed in square bracket (eg, a[10]). Hence, it is also called indexed or subscripted variables. In an array index of array represent the size of an array.

Let us consider, int age[5]

This mean array name is age which is capable of storing 5 different data under integer datatype.

age[0] = 15

age[1] = 25

age[2] = 13

age[3] = 22

age[4] = 17

Types of array

Depending upon the number of subscript or index number array are of 2 types:

    1-Dimension
    N-Dimension (Multi-dimension)

1-Dimension:

This type of array has only one subscript.

Declaration:

Data_type array_name[size]

Example:

int salary[100]

Program example.

Q1. WAP to input 10 different number and print them all.
#include  
int main()
{
    int a[10], i;
    printf ("Enter any 10 number");
    for(i=0;i<10;i++)
    {
        scanf("%d",&a[i]);
    }
    for(i=0;i<10;i++)
    {
        printf(“%d”,&a[i]);
    }
        return 0;
}

Q2. WAP to input salary of 1000 employees and calculate average salary.
#include  
int main()
{
    int sal[1000], i, s=0;
    float av;
    printf ("Enter any 10 number");
    for(i=0;i<1000;i++)
    {
        scanf(“%d”,&sal[i]);
    }
    for(i=0;i<1000;i++)
    {
        s=s+sal[i];
    }
   av = s/1000;
   printf(“Average salary of 1000 employee is %f”, av);
   return 0;
}

Q3. WAP to input salary of 1000 employees and count total number of employee getting salary between 30000 and 50000.
#include  
int main()
{
    int sal[1000], i, c=0;
    for(i=0;i<1000;i++)
    {
        scanf(“%d”,&sal[i]);
    }
    for(i=0;i<1000;i++)
    {
        if(sal[i]>=30000 && sal[i]>=50000)
            {
               c=c+1;
            }
     }
   printf(“Total number of employee is %d”, c);
   return 0;
}

Q5. WAP to input 10 different number and find the greatest among them.
#include  
int main()
{
    int a[10], i, g;
    printf ("Enter any 10 number");
    for(i=0;i<10;i++)
    {
        scanf("%d",&a[i]);
    }
    g = a[0];
    for (i=0;i<10;i++)
    {
        if (g>a[i])
        {
            g=a[i];
        }
    }
    printf("Greatest number is %d\n",g);
    return 0;
}

Q6. WAP to input 10 different number and sort the in ascending order.
#include  
int main()
{
    int a[10], i, j, temp;
    printf ("Enter any 10 number");
    for(i=0;i<10;i++)
    {
        scanf("%d",&a[i]);
    }
    for (i=0;i<10;i++)
    {
        for (j=0;j<10;j++)
        {
            If (a[j]>a[j+1])
				{
				temp = a[j];
				a[j] = a[j+1];
				a[j+1] = temp;
				}
        }
    }
    printf(“Ascending order is”);
    for (i=0;i<10;i++)
    {
        Printf(“%d \t”,a[i]);
    }
    return 0;
}

Q3. WAP to input salary of n-employees and count total number of employee getting salary between 30000 and 50000.
#include  
int main()
{
    int sal[1000], i, c=0, n;
    printf("Enter the number of employees");
    scanf("%d",&n);
      for(i=0;i=30000 && sal[i]>=50000)
            {
               c=c+1;
            }
     }
   printf(“Total number of employee is %d”, c);
   return 0;
}

N-Dimension (Multidimension array)

This type of array has more than one subscript.

Declaration:

Data_type array_name[size][size]

Example:

int n[3][3]

Program example

Q1. WAP to input 3x3 matrix data and display the data of it.
#include  
int main()
{   int a[3][3],i,j;
    printf("Enter 9 number");
    for (i=0;i<3;i++)
    {
        for (j=0;j<3;j++)
        {
            scanf("%d",&a[i][j]);
        }
    }
    for (i=0;i<3;i++)
    {
        for (j=0;j<3;j++)
        {
            printf("%d\t",a[i][j]);
        }
        printf("\n");
    }
    return 0;
}

Q2. WAP to input 3x3 matrix and perform matrix addition
#include 
int main()
{   int a[3][3], b[3][3], c[3][3],i ,j;
    printf("Enter 9 number");
    for (i=0;i<3;i++)
    {
        for (j=0;j<3;j++)
        {
            scanf(“%d%d”,&a[i][j],&b[i][j]);
        }
    }
    for (i=0;i<3;i++)
    {
        for (j=0;j<3;j++)
        {
            c[i][j] = a[i][j] + b[i][j];
        }
        printf("\n");
    }
printf(“Added matrix is”);
for (i=0;i<3;i++)
    {
        for (j=0;j<3;j++)
        {
            printf(“%d \t”,c[i][j]);
        }
printf(“\n”);
    }
    return 0;
}

Q2. WAP to input 3x3 matrix and perform matrix multiplication
#include 
int main()
{   int a[3][3], b[3][3], p[3][3],i ,j, k;
    printf("Enter 9 number");
    for (i=0;i<3;i++)
    {
        for (j=0;j<3;j++)
        {
            scanf(“%d%d”,&a[i][j],b[I][j]);
        }
    }
    for (i=0;i<3;i++)
    {
        for (j=0;j<3;j++)
        {
			p[i][j] = 0;
			for(k=0;k<3;k++)
      			  {
            		p[i][j] = p[i][j] + a[i][k]*b[k][j];
        		  }
       }   
     }
printf(“Multiplied matrix is”);
for (i=0;i<3;i++)
    {
        for (j=0;j<3;j++)
        {
            printf(“%d \t”,p[i][j]);
        }
printf(“\n”);
    }
    return 0;
}

String: String is a group of characters that can be represented only by character array. To represent a character/string we use ‘char’ datatype.

i.e. char a, char a=‘x’

Where, char is data type and a is string variable and ‘x’ is a character.

Similarly, we can initialize string as one-dimension character array as:

Char a[5] = “hello” which is stored in array as follow
a[0]	a[1]	a[2]	a[3]	a[4]	a[5]
‘h’	‘e’	‘l’	‘l’	‘o’	\0

we can initialize array of string as two-dimension array as:

Char a[2][5] = {“ball” , “cat” , “apple”}, which is stored in array as follow
a[2][5]	a[0]	a[1]	a[2]	a[3]	a[4]	a[5]
a[0]	‘b’	‘a’	‘l’	‘l’	\0	 
a[1]	‘c’	‘a’	’t’	\0	 	 
a[2]	‘a’	‘p’	‘p’	‘l’	‘e’	\0

String handling function [Library function / Inbuilt function] V.imp

As we know, functions are the self contained program that performs certain task. Similarly the function which are given by C-library itself or inbuilt in C-library are known as library or inbuilt-function. String handling function or string function are the library functions which are used to manipulate strings in our program for simplicity and convenience. This inbuilt functions are defined under the header file ’string.h’ . In C we have several string handling functions which are as follows:

[Note: don’t miss ’string.h’ header file]

1) strlen( )
Function: This function returns total number of characters in a given string.
Syntax: strlen(string);
Program example:
#include 
#include 
int main()
{
    char a[10];
    int l;
    printf("Enter any string");
    scanf("%s",a);
    l=strlen(a);
    printf("The length is %d",l);
    return 0;
}

2) strrev( )
Function: This function returns reverse of given string i.e. if we enter ‘ball’ it will return ‘llab’
Syntax: strrev(string);
Program example:
#include 
#include 
int main()
{
    char a[10];
    printf("Enter any string");
    scanf("%s",a);
    strrev(a);
    printf("The reverse is %s”,a);
    return 0;
}

3) strlwr( )
Function: This function returns given string in lower case i.e. small letters.
Syntax: strlwr(string);
Program example:
#include 
#include 
int main()
{
    char a[10];
    printf("Enter any string");
    scanf("%s",a);
    strlwr(a);
    printf("The lower case is %s”,a);
    return 0;
}

4) strupr( )
Function: This function returns given string in upper case i.e. capital letters.
Syntax: strupr(string);
Program example:
#include 
#include  
int main()
{
    char a[10];
    printf("Enter any string");
    scanf("%s",a);
    strupr(a);
    printf("The upper case is %s”,a);
    return 0;
}

5) strcpy( )
Function: This function copies one string to another i.e. source_string to destination_string
Syntax: strcpy(destination_string,source_string);
Program example:
#include 
#include 
int main()
{
    char a[10],b[10];
    printf("Enter any string");
    scanf("%s",a);
    strcpy(b,a);
    printf("The copied string is %s”,b);
    return 0;
}

6) strcat( )
Function: This function adds two strings into one.The process of adding strings is known as string concatenation.
Syntax: strcat(string1,string2);
Program example:
#include 
#include 
int main()
{
    char a[10],b[10];
    printf("Enter first string");
    scanf("%s",a);
    printf("Enter second string");
    scanf(“%s”,b);
    strcat(a,b);
    printf("The added string is %s”,a);
    return 0;
}

7) strcmp( )
Function: This function compare two strings and return 0 if both string are equal else return -1/1 if not equal.
Syntax: strcmp(string1,string2);
Program example:
#include 
#include 
int main()
{
    char a[10],b[10];
    Int x;
    printf("Enter first string");
    scanf("%s",a);
    printf("Enter second string");
    scanf(“%s”,b);
    x = strcmp(a,b);
    printf("The compared value is %d”,x);
    return 0;
}

Some important program using string functions

WAP to check whether the given string is palindrome or not [MADAM is palindrome]
#include 
#include 
int main()
{   char a[10],b[10];
    printf("Enter string");
    scanf("%s",a);
    strcpy(b,a)
    strrev(a);
    if(strcmp(a,b)==0)
        {
            printf("%s is palindrome”,b);
        }
        else
        {   
printf("%s is not palindrome”,b);
        }
    return 0;
}

Click here for C programming course content

    Chapter 6: Web technology - I 

Introduction to the Internet

Internet is the global network of networks. Or it is huge collection of computers all over the world that is inter-connected to one another in various ways to form a web-net.

Components required for Internet Connections: The basic requirements Internet are:

a)     A TCP/IP (Transmission Control Protocol/Internet Protocol) enabled computer with web browser.

b)     An account with an ISP (Internet Service Provider)

c)     A telephone line

d)     A MODEM to connect to the telephone line and computer

e)     A set of computer: The capacity of computer should be as follow:

-       Minimum 386 microprocessor chip with 16 MB RAM

-       Color monitor with 256 color support and 640x480m resolution

-       A hard disk of 200 MB free space

-       Multimedia sound card and speaker
Internet Services and Applications

a) World Wide Web (WWW): WWW is a series of services that are interconnected through hypertext. It provides link in the web document. It is the most important services provided by the Internet. It was created in 1990 European Particle Physics Laboratory in Geneva, Switzerland to exchange and share data through the Internet using the protocol known as Hypertext Transfer Protocol (HTTP).

b) Web Browser: A web browser is a computer program that accesses web pages and displays them on computer screen. Or web browser is client software that allows the users to display and interact with a web page. It is the basic software that is needed to find, retrieve (open), view, send and receive information over the Internet. Without these web browser we cannot open WWW. Internet Explorer, Safari, Mozilla Firebox, Opera, Depnet Explorer, Netscape Navigator, Mosaic, etc. are some popular web browsers.

c) FTP - File Transfer Protocol: It is an Internet tool that permits an Internet user to move or transfer a file from one computer to another. The files may have data, graphics, text, etc.

d) Electronic Mail (E-mail): Sending and receiving messages electronically through the Internet is called E-mail. It is most widely used feature on the Internet. E-mail messages include a variety of digital text, graphics, video, animation, and audio data.

e)  Voicemail: Voicemail is a service offered by specialized computer hardware and software that answers telephone calls and records audio messages. We can talk to people using voicemail in easy way.

f) USENET – View and News:  View and News or USENET is the BBS (Bulletin Board Service) of Internet. The messages in this BBS are organized into thousands of News groups, which cover specific areas of Internet.

g) Chat: Chat is a special feature provided by Internet to communicate with each other by typing in real time. A user can log-on into any chatting room and can connect with any person who is online. It is very easy way to exchange our ideas, feelings, information each other. The facility of offline message is also provided here, if your friend is not online.

h) IRC: Internet Relay Chat (IRC) is a huge multi-user live chat facility. There are a number of major IRC servers around the world, which are linked to each other. Anyone can create a channel and all others in the channel see anything that anyone types in a given channel.

i) Video Conferencing: It is known as web cam chatting these days. This Video Conferencing uses the same technology as IRC but also provides sound and video pictures. It enables direct face-to-face communication across networks. It also provides real-time visual communications (online chat).

j) Universal Resource Locator (URL): URL is a unique address that identifies its location on the Internet. Web browsers utilize the URL to retrieve a file from the computer on which it resides. The format of the URL is given below:

http                   -           protocol

www                 -           host computer name

animalplanet       -           domain name

com                  -           domain type

k) E-Fax (Electronic Fax): It is another facility available in the Internet to send and receive faxes directly on our computer. It is very same of E-mail. The E-Fax message first goes to the Internet server, then the Internet server sends it to its destination whereas E-mail message goes to the local file server.
Q. Difference between E-mail and E-Fax
E-mail	E-Fax
1. It is very cheap.	1. It takes more cost than E-mail.
2. Message first goes to the local server.	2. Message first goes to the internet server and then to its destination.
3. Message is to be stored in the hard disk of the destination computer (server).	3. Message directly goes to print in the printer of the designation (destination) computer.

l) TELNET – Remote Login:  Telnet allows users to login to a host computer from a remote computer using a telnet program. In other words, it gives the user the opportunity to be on one computer system and work on another computer system, which may be across the street or thousands of miles away.

m) Navigators – Information Servers: These are special features of Internet to discover, locate, and retrieve information on various objects. Some of the well-known utilities are Gopher, Archie, Hytelnet, WAIS, and WWW. The WWW navigator is the most popular and has resulted in the massive growth of Internet resources.

Internet Terminologies
Some common terms related to Internet 

ISP: ISP (Internet Service Provider) is an institution that provides access to the Internet in some form, usually for money. Mercantile, Everest net, World link, etc. are some ISP in Nepal.

Link: Links are quick route (way) to jump the other web pages from your current page. This is one of the ways to negative the Internet. Links are usually printed in different colour than the rest of the text around it. 

 Search Engine: Search engines are the software that searches the web sites for you. Yahoo, Excite, Lycos, Alta Vista, etc. are some examples.

 Domain Name and IP (Internet Protocol) Address: The unique name that identifies an Internet site. Domain names always have 2 or more parts, separated by dots. The part on the left is the most specific, and the part on the right is the most general. IP (Internet Protocol) address is the corresponding number of domain name, which creates the logical connections between different computers using different domain name and transfer data from one computer to another.

 DNS Server: DNS (Domain Name Services) Server is an Internet-wide structure unique alphanumeric name for computer hosts agents TCP/IP numeric host address. Eg. Internet.net

 Web Server: Web server is a site on which the WebPages are kept. It is a program that responds to requests from web browsers to relative resources.

 Usernet Newsgroups or Net News: These are special headlines through which you can search the related topics easily. Eg. You can type Sci for science, Rec for recreation, etc.

While you type this letters in Search box, you will get related information about science or recreation.

 Mailing Lists: Mailing lists are special type of e-mail list, which are delivered via email to the individual mailboxes (email recipients) that subscribe to the list.

POP Server: This is the server where your incoming mails are stored in your mailbox for you to collect it from. Post Office Protocol (POP) is designed to allow single-user hosts to read mail from a server. It means only that particular person can read that mail that knows the username and password to enter his site.
SMTP Server: Simple Mail Transfer Protocol (SMTP) is used to transfer electronic mail between computers. It is a server-to-server protocol, so other protocols are used to access the messages. It accepts incoming mails from other Internet Hosts and drops incoming mail to your mailbox.
FTP (File Transfer Protocol): FTP is one of the protocols. Protocols are set of rules that the computers in the network must follow to communicate and to exchange data with each other. They are used to make logical connection between different computers and transfer data from one computer to another. TCP/IP, HTTP, SMTP, POP are also some protocols.
Anonymous FTP: The word 'Anonymous' refers to the things, which are not made public or kept on hidden or unknown. So, Anonymous FTP is a facility to retrieve (open and use) archived sites which contain software, documents of various sorts, files for configuring networks, graphic images, song, lyrics, etc.

# Archived files: It is a collection of various files, which are not made public.

 HTTP (Hypertext Transfer Protocol): This is one of the protocols that web browsers and web servers use to communicate with each other. When a web browser requests an HTML (Hypertext Markup Language) document from a web server, the connection is open, the document is transferred and the connection is closed with HTTP protocol.
Proxy Server: It is a server to improve the access speed of particular pointed browser. It also updates and sometime asks to update the information on your site, itself.

Internet Roaming: It is a facility that makes possible to use our Internet Account provided by local ISP, from any part (country) of the world while we are roaming (visiting). But our ISP should be a partner of Global Roaming Community. And we should type full email address. 

Here,     krishna -           It is user name.

            @         -           This symbol separates the user name and domain name.

            wlink     -           It is ISP name which provides internet access account.

            .com     -           It indicates the commercial organization or business.

            .np       -           It indicates the country code. Where .np for Nepal.

 
Introduction to HTML

HTML stands for Hyper Text Markup Language which are used to create web pages that are used in internet to exchange data and information. HTML file itself is a text file which contains several tags and attributes. HTML was develop by Tim Berner Lee that was based on SGML (Standard Generalized Markup Language). The tags and attributes used to create HTML file are displayed using web browser. Web browser helps to understand all the tags and attributes given by the user and generate the contain of the page. The different version of HTML are: HTML, HTML+, HTML 1.0, HTML2.0, HTML3.2, HTML 4.01 and now HTML 5.0.
Use of HTML:

    It is used to create a basic layout or design of web page.
    Without HTML worldwide web wouldn't exist.
    It allows features like embedding images, videos, audio etc.
    It allows user to customize and format characters such as bold, italic, underline etc.
    It helps to create link and list.

Advantages of HTML:

    It is easy to use, flexible and user friendly.
    It can be supported by all the web browser and operating system such as Macintosh, windows, unix etc
    It is easier to obtain and modify any of the content.
    It is compatible with all the search engine.
    There are several new and advance features in HTML 5.0.
    HTML file takes short period of time to load.
    Several tutorial can be easily accessed regarding HTML.

Disadvantage of HTML:

    It is difficult to create attractive and interactive webpages only using HTML. [php, javascript, sql etc]
    It cannot be used to create dynamic webpages.
    It is only a scripting language and cannot be used as programming language.
    There are many incompatibilities of HTML.
    There is no any complete acceptable standard of HTML.

Tags

HTML tag are the instructions or command given to the web browser in order to organize text image and any other components of web pages. This HTML tags are executed by web browser respectively. Like any programming language this HTML tags also helps to perform some specific actions. HTML tags are written inside angular brackets <> . There are two types of  HTML tag. 

Note: HTML tags and attributes are not case sensitive.

a. Pair tag:  Those tags which have both opening and closing tags are known as pair tag. They are also known as container tags. If a tag is written only within the angular brackets <> then it is known as opening tag. Whereas, same tag is written within a angular bracket preceded by slash / then it is known as closing tag.

b. Singular tag: Those tag which have only opening tag but no closing tag are known as singular tag. They are also known as empty tag.

     For eg, 

Attributes

They are the descriptive properties of a HTML tags written within respective tag. Attributes helps to add some extra feature, which allows designer to customize and modify several components of webpages according to requirement.

Eg, If is the tag then its attributes are:

bgcolor = It helps to add background color.

text = It helps to change the color of the text written in webpages.

background = It helps to add image in background of webpages.

Which are written as:

Steps to write and execute HTML document.

a. Write all the HTML tags, attributes and related information in a notepad.

b. Save your document by using desired name followed by .HTML extension. Eg, sample.html

c. Execute the html file by using any web browser.
Some common terminologies of web designing.

a. Webpage: It is generally a HTML document or written in any other scripting language that help to execute information in the form of text, image, or any other component through internet is called webpage.

b. Website: The collection of interrelated webpages is known as website. It may contain any piece of information or may have information that are interrelated with several webpages that are connected through hyperlink. All website has two part

Domain name: The name use to access website.

Web server: It is a storage location where every piece of information associated with website are stored.

c. Home page: The introductory page which is executed at first when we access the website.

d. Web browser: It is an application program which help to access any content of webpages that may be in any form using HTTP (Hyper Text Transfer Protocol). This protocol helps to make communication between web browser and web server. For eg, Google chrome, Internet explorer (Microsoft Edge), Safari, Mozilla firefox, Netscape navigator etc.

e. URL: It stands for Uniform Research Locator. It is a standard way of referencing a protocol, host and a directory. For eg https://readersnepal.com
DBMS (Database Management System)

Data: Data are the raw facts and figures. Data are isolated, uninterpreted and doesn't give any sense unless and until they are processed. Simply, they are the entities collected from the random world which under goes for processing. For eg, Ram,19,12,Pokhara

Information: Information are the meaningful result which are obtain after processing and gives some meaning and sense. Generally, It is a processed version of data. For eg, Ram is a student whose age is 19, he lives in Pokhara-12.

As we know, information are obtain after processing data. Hence, we need data processing for converting data into information. Therefor, systematic and scientific arrangement and organization of data so that, we can retrieve it whenever require quickly and easily is called database. Database is organized collection of data for converting data and information so that it can give some meaningful result. For eg, Dictionary, Mark ledger, Census, Telephone directory etc.

Since, manual collection and organization of data is time consuming, unsecured and complex, there is an application program which helps to maintain database i.e. systematic and scientific organization and collection of data. so, we can retrieve any piece of information within a fraction of time without any effort. Hence, the software or system built to fulfill the above requirement is known as database management system. In other word, it is a collection of software that manages data stored in database. The main purpose of DBMS is to store data, process them and obtain desired information. For Eg, Ms-Access, My-SQL, Oracle, Fox pro, dBase.
Advantages/features/importance of DBMS

    It allows user to search quickly and easily.
    It helps to reduce data redundancy(repetition)
    It allows user to share data over a network.
    It helps in data security and privacy,
    It improves data inconsistency(variance).
    It provides an organized way of storing data.

Disadvantages

    Installation and operating cost is higher.
    It requires more disk space.
    It may sometime have security and privacy issue.
    Technical manpower (DBA) required to maintain and operate.

Q) Define CSS. Explain its type. [V.important] click here

    Chapter 7: Multimedia 

Introduction: Multimedia consist of two words ‘Multi’ and ‘Media’, Where multi means many and media means way/medium of expressing information. Hence, multimedia is the way of expressing information in different forms. The information can be expressed in either text, audio, video, graphics and animation. We use several forms of media for better understanding and effective communication. By using multimedia any information can be illustrated in greater depth.

Since single form of media is inefficient for better communication and greater understanding, we integrate several components of multimedia (text, audio video, animation and graphics) by using multimedia computer system. Hence the integration of different forms of media is mandatory for effective communication. Multimedia computer system consist of multimedia hardware and multimedia software. Printer, projector, webcam, microphone, digital camera etc are some of the widely used multimedia computer hardware. Similarly software like text editor (MS Word), Presentation tool (Power Point), Photo editing (Photo Shop), Video editing (iMovie), Accounting package (Tally) etc are used as a multimedia software. These multimedia hardware and software works together in order to integrate several components of multimedia. for eg: video can be a created by integrating audio and images.
Advantages/Merits/Pros/Importance of multimedia

    It helps to make communication much more effective
    It enhances the level of understanding in any particular topic.
    Games, Cartoons, movies are made more effective and realistic by using multimedia.
    It makes teaching and learning process much more interesting and intuitive.
    Virtual reality and simulation has become more realistic.

Disadvantages/De-merits/Cons/Limitation of multimedia

    Multimedia Components may be expensive.
    Technical knowledge and IT literacy is required to operate multimedia.
    Technology is always changing and never constant.
    Multimedia devices runs on electricity.

Components/Elements of multimedia

    Text: It is the collection of alpha numeric values or any characters. It can be a word, single line or a paragraph. We can create and customize text by using several text editor or word processor such as MS-Word, Notepad etc. It is the basic form or way of expressing information. By using multimedia software we can customize the text by giving several size, color, type, style etc. Extension of text documents are .docx, .txt etc.
    Graphics / Images: ”A picture is of thousand words" which means picture can describe things more than a text. Graphics generally refers to image or pictures. The smallest element of picture is called Pixel (Picture Element). Hence the quality of image or picture is denoted by number of pixel available in that picture, Generally termed as resolution. We use several multimedia software such as Adobe Photo shop, Corel draw, Adobe indesign etc. Extension of images are .jpeg, .png etc.
    Audio: Audio is the one of the important components of multimedia. It gives the sensation of hearing. Audio can be used to enhance the understanding level in any particular topic. Audio can be human voice, instrument notes, natural sound, digitally synthesized sound and many more. In these days Audio can be transfer from one place to another by converting it into digital signal. FM radio use this component to express their information. Several multimedia software such as windows media player can be used to play audio. Extension of audio are .mp3, .wma etc.
    Video: The video is the running frames of static pictures that means video are generated by capturing maximum number of images in unit time. Frame per second [FPS] is the term widely used to describe the smoothness of a video. Generally there are 15-25 frame per seconds, to generate smooth movement in video. But 30 and 60 FPS are the widely used standard in different devices. We can use different multimedia software such as iMovie, Final cut pro, Filmora etc to edit and customize our video. Extension of video are .mp4, .mpeg etc.
    Animation: Animation is the sequence of vector(Computer Generated) image displayed in rapid succession to provide visual effects. These image are computer based images. The animation is created to express ideas where complex explanation should be effectively deliver. These components are widely used in movie industry, and in other entertainment industry. Animation can be either 2D or 3D. 3D animation are more realistic in nature. So, different movies used 3D animation to express information which are not feasible in real life. We use several multimedia software such as Maya animation, Auto CAD, Macromedia flash etc. Extension of animation are .flv, .gif etc.

Application of areas of multimedia. [Explain on your own]

    Education
    Communication
    Entertainment
    Medicine
    Science and technology
    Advertisement
    Websites/Webpages
    Research and engineering

    Chapter 8. Information Security and Cyber Law 

1. What is Information Technology? Describe it with its social impacts.

Information Technology is a modern concept or methodology of communication. It is the combined form of Information and Communication Technology, which is highly used for the information flow and in many other fields. IT has made the world closer day by day. One can easily send and receive the message throughout the world within a second. It has been widely used in education, industry, banks, research center, hospitals, etc. It is being used as learning and teaching tool in the sector of education. Distant learning has become possible due to the advancement of IT. It has been highly used in the industries to control quantity and quality of the product. It is equally used for the management in hospitals and for the treatment of the patients. IT is being used in the sector of animation and other entertainment. Scientists can use computer or IT for their research and experiment. Space technology has become possible due to the IT. Thus it has much such a positive impact on the society. But it has some negative impacts, too. As the use of IT is increasing day by day, the cyber crimes are also increasing. Cyber criminals can easily steal others’ information or data, they can disclose other secrecy, and they can easily spread the virus in the network and disturbs the social peace and security. 
Information Security

As we know, In a network or cyber space there is always threat of cyber attacks which may leads to loss and damages of our precious data and information. It is always necessary to be aware of such malicious activity. We need to adopt different measures while using computer from such intentional and accidental activities. Thus, information security refers to the process of protecting our network infrastructure from unauthorized access, misuse, modification, destruction or any malfunction. We can use several physical and software preventive measures to protect ourselves from such unethical activities. Information security helps to create a secure environment for computers, users and programs.

Information security can mitigate security threats and security attacks. Security threats is possible danger that might cause unwanted activities in our computer system to breach security and thus cause possible harm whereas security attack is an attempt to gain unauthorized access to destroy, expose, steal or alter others valuable data and information. This attacks can be triggered by malicious application such as viruses, spyware, Trojan horse, WORMS etc.

Information security are built around three major objectives:

Confidentiality: It means information are available for only the authorized individual, that means individual or any other system cannot use or process others information without proper authorization.

Integrity: It indicates accuracy and completeness of data and information which means without proper authorization data and information cannot be tampered.

Availability: It means information must be always available as per the requirement of the user. It generally refers to accessing out valuable data and information whenever required with in no time.
Cryptography

The cryptography is derived from the Greek word which means “Secret writing”. Cryptography is the art and science of hiding information. It provides security for information. It is used for providing secure communication between individuals, government agencies and military force. Cryptography mostly refers to Encryption and Decryption. Encryption is the process of converting plaintext that is message to unreadable format. So that anyone who tries to see the message cannot read the original message. The plain text are converted into unreadable text using special algorithm and keys. The unreadable text is called cipher text. These cipher text are again converted into readable form through the process of decryption. Decryption is the reverse process of encryption. Sometimes, encryption is also termed as encoding or encipher and its reverse process i.e. decryption is also termed as decoding or decipher.
2. What is Digital Divide?

Digital Divide is the term used for the gap between the computer literate and illiterate people. Or it can be said that it is a division between technical and non-technical man powers in the field. IT is the modern technology and for the use of this technology, one can have sound knowledge of computers. But still there are a great number of people, who do not know the computers’ operations. They do not understand the computer related terms. This difference or gap is called digital divide. First, this term came into practice in the mid of 1990s by political speeches and news media. This division is increasing day by day in between urban area people and rural area people, educated and uneducated, rich and poor and so on. So it has become a global issue and governments are trying to bridge this gap.
3. What are the computer ethics or cyber ethics?

The computer ethics or the cyber ethics are the set of moral principles or the codes of conduct, which should be strictly followed by the computer professionals. The intention of the computer or cyber ethics is to avoid the criminal activities through the use of computers. The following are some examples of computer ethics:

i. Do not use other’s password

ii. Do not steal other’s information

iii. Do not use computers to harm others

iv. Do not disclose other’s secrecy

v. Do not spread virus in the network

vi. Do not copy licensed software, which you have not paid

vii. Do not alter other’s data

viii. Do not take possession to other people’s intellectual property

ix. Do not misuse electronic transaction

x. Do not use computer to bear false witness, etc.
4. What is cyber crime? List out some examples of cyber crimes.

The act of misusing computers, Internet or other electronic media is called cyber crime. As the use of Information Technology is increasing, the act of cyber crime is also increasing day by day. The following are some examples of cyber crime:

i. Misuse of computers

ii. Spreading virus

iii. Stealing other’s information

iv. Pirating licensed software

v. Disclosing of other’s secrecy

vi. Misuse of electronic transaction and electronic media

vii. Rude and vulgar comments in Internet on racial, communal and others

viii. Alteration of other data without permission

ix. Spying others’ information

x. Cracking or hacking

xi. Password guessing

xii. Salami saving and data diddling

xiii. Forgery

xiv. DOS attack, etc.
5. What is Cyber Law? Define and write some provisions of it.

The law regarding the use of computers is called Cyber Law. It highly concerns with the misuse of the computers, Internet and other electronic media, which are specially used for information flow. Cyber ethics just suggest not committing computer crimes or cyber crimes but the cyber law strictly defines the punishment in case of violation of the laws or cyber principles. Actually the cyber law is in practice to support the cyber ethics. Nepal Government also has issued the Cyber Law on 11th Falgun, 2061 (18th March 2005) as “The Electronic Transaction Ordinance, 2005”.

It has the following provisions:

·       Electronic and Digital Signature Law

·       Intellectual Property Law

Copyright Law

Trademark Law

Semiconductor Law

Patent Law

·       Telecommunication Law

·       Data Protection and Privacy Law
6. Explain the different objectives of IT Policy of Nepal.

The IT policies of Nepal are:

·       To declare IT as a high priority sector of government and make it practical

·       To establish knowledge based industries to increase employment

·       To make public information and service delivery inclusive and effective through the philosophy of e-government

·       To increase the productive use of IT in social, economic and business organizations

·       To increase access to IT related international attempts and developments

·       To make Government Integrated Data Center (GIDC) effective in order to develop as an infrastructure for IT development                                                                                                                                       Paraphase these notes. Dont reduce the content